Ohio, session 136, HB441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2305.11 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2305.11. (A) An action for libel, slander, malicious prosecution, or false imprisonment, an action for malpractice other than an action upon a medical, dental, optometric, or chiropractic claim, an action for legal malpractice against an attorney or a law firm or legal professional association, or an action upon a statute for a penalty or forfeiture shall be commenced within one year after the cause of action accrued, provided that an action by an employee for the payment of unpaid minimum wages, unpaid overtime compensation, or liquidated damages by reason of the nonpayment of minimum wages or overtime compensation shall be commenced within two years after the cause of action accrued. (B) (B)(1) An action for libel or slander shall be commenced within four years after the cause of action accrues. (2) A cause of action for libel accrues from the date of publication of the alleged libelous matter, regardless of when the aggrieved person knew of, or discovered, the alleged libelous matter or regardless of when the aggrieved party reasonably should have known of, or discovered, the alleged libelous matter. Each publication of the alleged libelous matter gives rise to a new limitations period. (3) A cause of action for slander accrues from the date the alleged slanderous words were spoken, regardless of when the aggrieved person knew of, or discovered, the alleged slanderous words or regardless of when the aggrieved party reasonably should have known of, or discovered, the alleged slanderous words. (C) A civil action for unlawful abortion pursuant to section 2919.12 of the Revised Code, a civil action authorized by division (H) of section 2317.56 of the Revised Code, a civil action pursuant to division (B) of section 2307.52 of the Revised Code for terminating or attempting to terminate a human pregnancy after viability in violation of division (A) of section 2919.17 of the Revised Code, and a civil action for terminating or attempting to terminate a human pregnancy of a pain-capable unborn child in violation of division (E) of section 2919.201 of the Revised Code shall be commenced within one year after the performance or inducement of the abortion or within one year after the attempt to perform or induce the abortion in violation of division (A) of section 2919.17 of the Revised Code or division (E) of section 2919.201 of the Revised Code. (C) (D) As used in this section, "medical claim," "dental claim," "optometric claim," and "chiropractic claim" have the same meanings as in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing section 2305.11 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.